Florida, session 2026, SB1718.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 33 34 Section 1.âParagraph (b) of subsection (3) of section 35 1004.85, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 36 1004.85âPostsecondary educator preparation institutes.â 37 (3)âEducator preparation institutes approved pursuant to 38 this section may offer competency-based certification programs 39 specifically designed for noneducation major baccalaureate 40 degree holders to enable program participants to meet the 41 educator certification requirements of s. 1012.56. An educator 42 preparation institute choosing to offer a competency-based 43 certification program pursuant to the provisions of this section 44 must implement a program developed by the institute and approved 45 by the department for this purpose. Approved programs shall be 46 available for use by other approved educator preparation 47 institutes. 48 (b)âEach program participant must: 49 1.âMeet certification requirements pursuant to s. 50 1012.56(1) by obtaining an eligible a statement of status of 51 eligibility in the certification subject area of the educational 52 plan and meet the requirements of s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f) before 53 participating in field experiences. An educator preparation 54 institute may allow a program participant to enroll in and 55 complete coursework while the participant is working to obtain 56 an eligible statement of status of eligibility in the 57 certification subject area of the educational plan. 58 2.âDemonstrate competency and participate in field 59 experiences that are appropriate to his or her educational plan 60 prepared under paragraph (a). Beginning with candidates entering 61 an educator preparation institute in the 2022-2023 school year, 62 a candidate for certification in a coverage area identified 63 pursuant to s. 1012.585(3)(f) must successfully complete all 64 competencies for a reading endorsement, including completion of 65 the endorsement practicum through the candidateâs field 66 experience, in order to graduate from the program. 67 3.âBefore completion of the program, fully demonstrate his 68 or her ability to teach the subject area for which he or she is 69 seeking certification by documenting a positive impact on 70 student learning growth in a prekindergarten through grade 12 71 setting and, except as provided in s. 1012.56(7)(a)3., achieving 72 a passing score on the professional education competency 73 examination, the basic skills examination, and the subject area 74 examination for the subject area certification which is required 75 by state board rule. 76 Section 2.âParagraph (b) of subsection (7) of section 77 1012.56, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 78 1012.56âEducator certification requirements.â 79 (7)âTYPES AND TERMS OF CERTIFICATION.â 80 (b)âThe department shall issue a temporary certificate to 81 any applicant who: 82 1.âCompletes the requirements outlined in paragraphs 83 (2)(a)-(f) and completes the subject area content requirements 84 specified in state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject 85 area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5) and holds an 86 accredited degree or a degree approved by the Department of 87 Education at the level required for the subject area 88 specialization in state board rule; 89 2.âFor a subject area specialization for which the state 90 board otherwise requires a bachelorâs degree, documents 48 91 months of active-duty military service with an honorable 92 discharge or a medical separation; completes the requirements 93 outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), and (d)-(f); completes the 94 subject area content requirements specified in state board rule 95 or demonstrates mastery of subject area knowledge pursuant to 96 subsection (5); and documents completion of 60 college credits 97 with a minimum cumulative grade point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 98 scale, as provided by one or more accredited institutions of 99 higher learning or a nonaccredited institution of higher 100 learning identified by the Department of Education as having a 101 quality program resulting in a bachelorâs degree or higher; or 102 3.âIs enrolled in a state-approved teacher preparation 103 program under s. 1004.04; is actively completing the required 104 program field experience or internship at a public school; 105 completes the requirements outlined in paragraphs (2)(a), (b), 106 and (d)-(f); completes the subject area content requirements 107 specified in state board rule or demonstrates mastery of subject 108 area knowledge pursuant to subsection (5); and documents 109 completion of 60 college credits with a minimum cumulative grade 110 point average of 2.5 on a 4.0 scale, as provided by one or more 111 accredited institutions of higher learning or a nonaccredited 112 institution of higher learning identified by the Department of 113 Education as having a quality program resulting in a bachelorâs 114 degree or higher; or 115 4.âCompletes the requirements in paragraphs (2)(a)-(f) and 116 whose previously issued professional certificate has expired. 117 118 At least 1 year before an individualâs temporary certificate is 119 set to expire, the department shall electronically notify the 120 individual of the date on which his or her certificate will 121 expire and provide a list of each method by which the 122 qualifications for a professional certificate can be completed. 123 Section 3.âSubsection (5) of section 1012.585, Florida 124 Statutes, is amended to read: 125 1012.585âProcess for renewal or reinstatement of 126 professional certificates.â 127 (5)âThe State Board of Education shall adopt rules to allow 128 the reinstatement of expired professional certificates, 129 including each subject area coverage and endorsement held by the 130 certificateholder at the time of the certificateâs expiration. 131 The department may reinstate an expired professional certificate 132 if the certificateholder: 133 (a)âSubmits an application for reinstatement of the expired 134 certificate. 135 (b)âCompletes the requirements in s. 1012.56(2)(a)-(f). 136 (c)(b)âDocuments completion of 6 college credits during the 137 5 years immediately preceding reinstatement of the expired 138 certificate, completion of 120 inservice points, or a 139 combination thereof, in an area specified in paragraph (3)(a) to 140 include the credit required under paragraph (3)(e). 141 (c)âDuring the 5 years immediately preceding reinstatement 142 of the certificate, achieves a passing score on the Florida 143 developed subject area examination or, if a Florida subject area 144 examination has not been developed, a standardized examination 145 specified in state board rule for each subject to be shown on 146 the reinstated certificate. 147 148 The requirements of this subsection may not be satisfied by 149 subject area examinations or college credits or inservice points 150 completed for issuance of the certificate that has expired. 151 Section 4.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 1012.981, 152 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 153 1012.981âThe Florida Center for Teaching Excellence.â 154 (2)âThe center shall, in collaboration with the David C. 155 Anchin Center for the Advancement of Innovative Teaching within 156 and Learning at the University of South Florida, do all of the 157 following: 158 (a)âDevelop and deliver evidence-based professional 159 learning opportunities aligned to the Florida Educator 160 Accomplished Practices. 161 (b)âDevelop and deliver educator training programs pursuant 162 to s. 1012.98 that integrate high-quality instructional 163 materials included on the state-adopted instructional materials 164 list under s. 1006.28, materials evaluated and identified 165 pursuant to s. 1001.215(4), and materials developed by or under 166 the direction of the department as provided in s. 1006.39. These 167 programs must focus on the effective use of knowledge-based 168 curricula, highlighting when and how to incorporate intervention 169 materials, and emphasize the importance of background knowledge 170 in building advanced reading comprehension grounded in the 171 science of reading and critical thinking skills. 172 (c)âDevelop and design models of high-quality clinical 173 experiences for aspiring teachers. These model experiences shall 174 serve as a standard that institutions approved pursuant to ss. 175 1004.04 and 1004.85 can adopt or adapt, enabling participants to 176 demonstrate mastery of instructional techniques, classroom 177 management strategies, and the application of high-impact 178 teaching strategies in authentic educational settings. 179 (d)âCollaborate with school districts and other educational 180 stakeholders to identify emerging needs in teacher preparation 181 and align center programs accordingly, conducting gap analyses 182 to provide comprehensive coverage of the science of learning, 183 high-impact teaching strategies, and knowledge-rich curriculum 184 implementation. 185 (e)âEstablish a statewide network of teachers and 186 instructional leaders equipped with the knowledge and skills to 187 mentor and support aspiring and current educators participating 188 in the centerâs programs. This network shall model effective 189 pedagogical practices and facilitate professional growth. 190 (f)âConduct research and disseminate findings on high 191 impact teaching practices and the implementation of knowledge 192 based curricula to inform policy, improve classroom instruction, 193 and address the importance of background knowledge in student 194 achievement. 195 (g)âReport to the department the completion of professional 196 learning by individuals who are not employed by entities with an 197 approved professional learning system. 198 (3)âThe center: 199 (a)âMust may submit a professional learning system for 200 approval pursuant to s. 1012.98. 201 (b)âShall allow a certified educator seeking to renew or 202 reinstate his or her certificate to use the system at no cost 203 and submit any inservice points earned by the educator through 204 the system to the department on the educatorâs behalf. 205 (c)âShall provide a certified educator seeking to renew or 206 reinstate a certificate with information on school district 207 professional learning systems that provide access to inservice 208 training to persons not employed by the school district. 209 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.